Mississippi, session 2026, HB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  If the United States Congress amends 15 USC 260a to authorize states to observe daylight saving time year-round, daylight saving time shall be the year-round standard time of the State of Mississippi and all of its political subdivisions. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.